Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-407
Damages.

In an action under the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act, damages may be awarded for all actual damages, including damages for wrongful death, as in other tort actions.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 7.